Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF853.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CURLING FACILITY.new text end new text begin $1,600,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Glacial Ridge Curling, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, to predesign, design, construct, furnish, and equip a new curling facility in the city of Willmar. This appropriation is available after the commissioner of management and budget determines that an amount sufficient to complete the project has been committed to the project as required by Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.502. This appropriation is onetime and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end